Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3,221
Towing of trailers; restrictions; section; how construed.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in the Motor Vehicle Registration Act:

(a) A cabin trailer shall only be towed by a properly registered:

(i) Passenger car;

(ii) Commercial motor vehicle or apportionable vehicle;

(iii) Farm truck;

(iv) Local truck;

(v) Minitruck;

(vi) Recreational vehicle;

(vii) Bus; or

(viii) Former military vehicle;

(b) A utility trailer shall only be towed by:

(i) A properly registered passenger car;

(ii) A properly registered commercial motor vehicle or apportionable vehicle;

(iii) A properly registered farm truck;

(iv) A properly registered local truck;

(v) A properly registered minitruck;

(vi) A properly registered recreational vehicle;

(vii) A properly registered motor vehicle which is engaged in soil and water conservation pursuant to section 60-3,149;

(viii) A properly registered well-boring apparatus;

(ix) A dealer-plated vehicle;

(x) A personal-use dealer-plated vehicle;

(xi) A properly registered bus;

(xii) A properly registered public power district motor vehicle or, beginning January 1, 2023, a properly registered metropolitan utilities district motor vehicle; or

(xiii) A properly registered former military vehicle;

(c) A farm trailer shall only be towed by a properly registered:

(i) Passenger car;

(ii) Commercial motor vehicle;

(iii) Farm truck;

(iv) Minitruck; or

(v) Former military vehicle;

(d) A commercial trailer shall only be towed by:

(i) A properly registered motor vehicle which is engaged in soil and water conservation pursuant to section 60-3,149;

(ii) A properly registered local truck;

(iii) A properly registered well-boring apparatus;

(iv) A properly registered commercial motor vehicle or apportionable vehicle;

(v) A dealer-plated vehicle;

(vi) A personal-use dealer-plated vehicle;

(vii) A properly registered bus;

(viii) A properly registered farm truck; or

(ix) A properly registered public power district motor vehicle or, beginning January 1, 2023, a properly registered metropolitan utilities district motor vehicle;

(e) A fertilizer trailer shall only be towed by a properly registered:

(i) Passenger car;

(ii) Commercial motor vehicle or apportionable vehicle;

(iii) Farm truck; or

(iv) Local truck;

(f) A pole and cable reel trailer shall only be towed by a properly registered:

(i) Commercial motor vehicle or apportionable vehicle;

(ii) Local truck; or

(iii) Public power district motor vehicle or, beginning January 1, 2023, metropolitan utilities district motor vehicle;

(g) A dealer-plated trailer shall only be towed by:

(i) A dealer-plated vehicle;

(ii) A properly registered passenger car;

(iii) A properly registered commercial motor vehicle or apportionable vehicle;

(iv) A properly registered farm truck;

(v) A properly registered minitruck;

(vi) A personal-use dealer-plated vehicle; or

(vii) A properly registered former military vehicle;

(h) Trailers registered pursuant to section 60-3,198 as part of an apportioned fleet shall only be towed by:

(i) A properly registered motor vehicle which is engaged in soil and water conservation pursuant to section 60-3,149;

(ii) A properly registered local truck;

(iii) A properly registered well-boring apparatus;

(iv) A properly registered commercial motor vehicle or apportionable vehicle;

(v) A dealer-plated vehicle;

(vi) A personal-use dealer-plated vehicle;

(vii) A properly registered bus; or

(viii) A properly registered farm truck; and

(i) A trailer registered as a historical vehicle pursuant to sections 60-3,130 to 60-3,134 shall only be towed by:

(i) A motor vehicle properly registered as a historical vehicle pursuant to sections 60-3,130 to 60-3,134;

(ii) A properly registered passenger car;

(iii) A properly registered commercial motor vehicle or apportionable vehicle; or

(iv) A properly registered local truck.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive compliance with the Nebraska Rules of the Road or Chapter 75.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any motor vehicle or trailer from displaying dealer license plates or an In Transit authorized by section 60-376.

Laws 2007, LB349, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB212, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB783, § 13;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 70;

Laws 2019, LB270, § 26;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 33;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 52.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Rules of the Road, see section 60-601.